Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-160
Employees of state or political subdivisions; prohibited from political activities during office hours, while performing official duties, or while wearing a uniform.

Unless specifically restricted by a federal law or any other state law, no employee of the state or any political subdivision thereof, as defined in subdivision (2) of section 13-702, shall be prohibited from participating in political activities except during office hours or when otherwise engaged in the performance of his or her official duties. No such employee shall engage in any political activity while wearing a uniform required by the state or any political subdivision thereof.

Laws 1977, LB 398, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 23-3001.

For other provisions relating to prohibited political activities, see section 81-1315.